Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0788.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 407b. A licensee shall not sell or otherwise transfer paraphernalia that has a heating element and is intended or designed to introduce marihuana into the human body unless the heating element is made of or encased in 1 or both of the following materials: (a) Glass. (b) Ceramic.